California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(a) A licensee shall retain certificates of continuing education course completion for six years.

(b) The committee may audit licensees’ continuing education records to ensure that continuing education requirements are met.

(c) It shall be unprofessional conduct for a licensee to furnish false or misleading information to the committee regarding continuing education.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 600, Sec. 7.   (SB 796)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 3686.)
-------------------------------------------

3635.2.

In addition to complying with subdivision (b) of Section 3635, the following shall apply to providers of continuing education:

(a) The content of continuing education courses and related materials shall provide balance, independence, objectivity, and scientific rigor. All patient care recommendations from continuing education courses involving clinical medicine shall be based on evidence accepted by naturopathic doctors. All scientific research used to support patient care recommendations shall conform to generally accepted standards of experimental design, data collection, and analysis.

(b) A conflict of interest is
 created when an individual in a position to control the content of a continuing education course, or his or her spouse or partner, has a relevant personal financial relationship within the past 12 months with a commercial entity that produces, markets, resells, or distributes health care goods or services consumed by, or used on patients that benefits the individual in any financial amount and therefore, may bias his or her opinions and teachings with respect to the content of continuing education courses. This may include receiving a salary, royalty, intellectual property rights, consulting fee, honoraria, ownership interest such as stocks, stock options or other ownership interest, excluding diversified mutual funds, or other financial benefit. Financial benefits are generally associated with roles such as employment, a management position, or an independent contractor position, including
 contracted research and clinical trials, consulting, speaking and teaching, membership on advisory committees or review panels, board membership, and other activities for which remuneration is received or expected.

(c) Prior to a course being presented, continuing education providers shall identify, disclose, and resolve all conflicts of interest. Individuals who fail or refuse to disclose relevant financial relationships shall not be approved as a provider of continuing education as described in subdivision (b) of Section 3635.

(d) Conflicts of interests shall be resolved by one of the following mechanisms:

(1) Altering financial relationships. Individuals may change their relationships with commercial interests, such as discontinuance
 of contracted services, thereby eliminating any conflict of interest related to the continuing education content.

(2) Altering control over content. An individual’s control of continuing education content may be altered in several ways to remove the opportunity to affect content related to the products and services of a commercial interest. These include the following:

(A) Choose someone else to control that part of the content. If a proposed presenter or planner has a conflict of interest related to the content, someone else who does not have a relationship to the commercial interests related to the content may present or plan that part of the content.

(B) Change the focus of the continuing education activity so that the
 content is not about products or services of the commercial interest that is the basis of the conflict of interest.

(C) Change the content of the individual’s assignment so that it is no longer about products or services of the commercial interest. For example, an individual with a conflict of interest regarding products for treatment of a condition could address the pathophysiology or diagnosis of the condition, rather than therapeutics.

(D) Limit the content to a report without recommendations. If an individual has been funded by a commercial entity to perform research, the individual’s presentation may be limited to the data and results of the research. Someone else may be assigned to address broader implications and recommendations.

(E) Limit the sources for recommendations. Rather than having a person with a conflict of interest present personal recommendations or personally select the evidence to be presented, limit the role of the person to reporting recommendations based on formal structured reviews of the literature with the inclusion and exclusion criteria stated “evidence-based.”

(3) Conflict of interest may be resolved if the continuing education material is peer reviewed and both of the following are met:

(A) All the recommendations involving clinical medicine are based on evidence that is accepted within the profession of naturopathic medicine as adequate justification for indications and contraindications in the care of patients.

(B) All scientific research referred to, reported, or used in the continuing education activity in support or justification of patient care recommendations conforms to the generally accepted standards of experimental design, data collection, and analysis.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 600, Sec. 8.   (SB 796)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 3686.)
-------------------------------------------

3636.

(a) Upon a written request, the board may grant inactive status to a naturopathic doctor who is in good standing and who meets the requirements of Section 462.

(b) A person whose license is in inactive status may not engage in any activity for which a license is required under this chapter.

(c) A person whose license is in inactive status shall be exempt from continuing education requirements while their license is in that status.

(d) To restore a license to active status, a person whose license is in inactive status shall fulfill continuing education requirements for
 the two-year period before reactivation and be current with all licensing fees as determined by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 497, Sec. 34.   (SB 1526)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 3686.)
-------------------------------------------

3637.

Only an individual may be licensed under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 485, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2004.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 3686.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Application of Chapter [3640. - 3645.]

3640.

(a) A naturopathic doctor may order and perform physical and laboratory examinations for diagnostic purposes, including, but not limited to, phlebotomy, clinical laboratory tests, speculum examinations, orificial examinations, and physiological function tests.

(b) A naturopathic doctor may order diagnostic imaging studies, including X-ray, ultrasound, mammogram, bone densitometry, and others, consistent with naturopathic training as determined by the board, but shall refer the studies to an appropriately licensed health care professional to conduct the study and interpret the results.

(c) A naturopathic doctor may
 dispense, administer, order, prescribe, and furnish or perform the following:

(1) Food, extracts of food, nutraceuticals, vitamins, amino acids, minerals, enzymes, botanicals and their extracts, botanical medicines, homeopathic medicines, all dietary supplements, and nonprescription drugs as defined by the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (21 U.S.C. Sec. 301 et seq.) consistent with the routes of administration identified in subdivision (d).

(2) Hot or cold hydrotherapy; naturopathic physical medicine inclusive of the manual use of massage, stretching, resistance, or joint play examination but exclusive of small amplitude movement at or beyond the end range of normal joint motion; electromagnetic energy; colon hydrotherapy; and therapeutic exercise.

(3) Devices, including, but not limited to, therapeutic devices, barrier contraception, and durable medical equipment.

(4) Health education and health counseling.

(5) Repair and care incidental to superficial lacerations and abrasions, except suturing.

(6) Removal of foreign bodies located in the superficial tissues.

(d) A naturopathic doctor may utilize routes of administration that include oral, nasal, auricular, ocular, rectal, vaginal, transdermal, intradermal, subcutaneous, intravenous, and intramuscular.

(e) The board may
 establish regulations regarding ocular or intravenous routes of administration that are consistent with the education and training of a naturopathic doctor.

(f) Nothing in this section shall exempt a naturopathic doctor from meeting applicable licensure requirements for the performance of clinical laboratory tests, including the requirements imposed under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1200).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 497, Sec. 35.   (SB 1526)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 3686.)
-------------------------------------------

3640.1.

(a) A naturopathic doctor may provide supervision and direction to a licensed vocational nurse in accordance with Sections 2859 and 2859.1.

(b) A naturopathic doctor shall not direct a licensed vocational nurse under their employment to take any action outside the scope of practice of the naturopathic doctor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 713, Sec. 5.   (SB 994)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 3686.)
-------------------------------------------

3640.2.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a naturopathic assistant may do all of the following:

(a) Administer medication only by intradermal, subcutaneous, or intramuscular injections and perform skin tests and additional technical support services upon the specific authorization and supervision of a licensed naturopathic doctor. A naturopathic assistant may also perform all these tasks and services in a clinic licensed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1204 of the Health and Safety Code upon the specific authorization of a naturopathic doctor.

(b) Perform venipuncture or skin puncture for the purposes of withdrawing blood upon
 specific authorization and under the supervision of a licensed naturopathic doctor if prior thereto the naturopathic assistant has met the educational and training requirements for medical assistants as established in Section 2070. A copy of any related certificates shall be retained as a record by each employer of the assistant.

(c) Perform the following naturopathic technical support services:

(1) Administer medications orally, sublingually, topically, vaginally, or rectally, or by providing a single dose to a patient for immediate self-administration. Administer medication by inhalation if the medications are patient-specific and have been or will be repetitively administered to the patient. In every instance, prior to administration of medication by the naturopathic
 assistant, the naturopathic doctor shall verify the correct medication and dosage.

(2) Apply and remove bandages.

(3) Collect by noninvasive techniques and preserve specimens for testing, including urine, sputum, semen, and stool.

(4) Assist patients to and from a patient examination room or examination table.

(5) As authorized by the naturopathic doctor, provide patient information and instructions.

(6) Collect and record patient data, including height, weight, temperature, pulse, respiration rate, and blood pressure, and basic information about the presenting and previous conditions.

(7) Perform simple laboratory and screening tests customarily performed in a medical office.

(d) Perform additional naturopathic technical support services under the regulations and standards established by the board. The board, before the adoption of any regulations, shall request recommendations regarding these standards from appropriate public agencies, including, but not limited to, the Osteopathic Medical Board of California, the Medical Board of California, the Board of Registered Nursing, the Board of Vocational Nursing and Psychiatric Technicians of the State of California, the Laboratory Field Services division of the State Department of Public Health, and the Physical Therapy Board of California. The California Board of Naturopathic Medicine shall also request recommendations
 regarding these standards from associations of medical assistants, physicians, and others, as appropriate, including, but not limited to, the Osteopathic Physicians and Surgeons of California, the California Medical Association, the California Society of Medical Assistants, and the California Medical Assistants’ Association. Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to supersede or modify that portion of the Administrative Procedure Act that relates to the procedure for the adoption of regulations set forth in Article 5 (commencing with Section 11346) of Chapter 3.5 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 497, Sec. 36.   (SB 1526)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 3686.)
-------------------------------------------

3640.3.

(a) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as authorizing the licensure of naturopathic assistants. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as authorizing the administration of local anesthetic agents by a naturopathic assistant. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as authorizing the California Board of Naturopathic Medicine to adopt any regulations that violate the prohibitions on diagnosis or treatment in Section 2052.

(b) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as authorizing a naturopathic assistant to perform any clinical laboratory test or examination for which they are not authorized under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1200).

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, a naturopathic assistant may not be employed for inpatient care in a licensed general acute care hospital, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 497, Sec. 37.   (SB 1526)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 3686.)
-------------------------------------------

3640.5.

Nothing in this chapter or any other law shall be construed to prohibit a naturopathic doctor from furnishing or ordering drugs when all of the following apply:

(a) The drugs are furnished or ordered by a naturopathic doctor in accordance with standardized procedures or protocols developed by the naturopathic doctor and their supervising physician and surgeon.

(b) The naturopathic doctor is functioning pursuant to standardized procedure, as defined by subdivisions (a), (b), (d), (e), (h), and (i) of Section 2836.1 and paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 2836.1, or protocol. The standardized procedure or protocol shall be developed
 and approved by the supervising physician and surgeon, the naturopathic doctor, and, where applicable, the facility administrator or their designee.

(c) The standardized procedure or protocol covering the furnishing of drugs shall specify which naturopathic doctors may furnish or order drugs, which drugs may be furnished or ordered under what circumstances, the extent of physician and surgeon supervision, the method of periodic review of the naturopathic doctor’s competence, including peer review, and review of the standardized procedure.

(d) The furnishing or ordering of drugs by a naturopathic doctor occurs under physician and surgeon supervision. Physician and surgeon supervision shall not be construed to require the physical presence of the physician, but does include all of
 the following:

(1) Collaboration on the development of the standardized procedure.

(2) Approval of the standardized procedure.

(3) Availability by telephonic contact at the time of patient examination by the naturopathic doctor.

(e) For purposes of this section, a physician and surgeon shall not supervise more than four naturopathic doctors at one time.

(f) Drugs furnished or ordered by a naturopathic doctor may include Schedule III through Schedule V controlled substances under the California Uniform Controlled Substances Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 11000) of the Health and Safety Code)
 and shall be further limited to those drugs agreed upon by the naturopathic doctor and physician and surgeon as specified in the standardized procedure. When Schedule III controlled substances, as defined in Section 11056 of the Health and Safety Code, are furnished or ordered by a naturopathic doctor, the controlled substances shall be furnished or ordered in accordance with a patient-specific protocol approved by the treating or supervising physician. A copy of the section of the naturopathic doctor’s standardized procedure relating to controlled substances shall be provided upon request, to a licensed pharmacist who dispenses drugs, when there is uncertainty about the naturopathic doctor furnishing the order.

(g) The board has certified that the naturopathic doctor has satisfactorily completed adequate coursework in pharmacology covering
 the drugs to be furnished or ordered under this section. The board shall establish the requirements for satisfactory completion of this subdivision.

(h) Use of the term “furnishing” in this section, in health facilities defined in subdivisions (b), (c), (d), (e), and (i) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, shall include both of the following:

(1) Ordering a drug in accordance with the standardized procedure.

(2) Transmitting an order of a supervising physician and surgeon.

(i) For purposes of this section, “drug order” or “order” means an order for medication which is dispensed to or for an ultimate user, issued by a naturopathic doctor as
 an individual practitioner, within the meaning of Section 1306.02 of Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(j) Notwithstanding any other law, the following apply:

(1) A drug order issued pursuant to this section shall be treated in the same manner as a prescription of the supervising physician.

(2) All references to prescription in this code and the Health and Safety Code shall include drug orders issued by naturopathic doctors.

(3) The signature of a naturopathic doctor on a drug order issued in accordance with this section shall be deemed to be the signature of a prescriber for purposes of this code and the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 497, Sec. 38.   (SB 1526)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 3686.)
-------------------------------------------

3640.7.

Notwithstanding the requirements of Section 3640.5 or any other provision of this chapter, a naturopathic doctor may independently prescribe and administer the following:

(a) Epinephrine to treat anaphylaxis.

(b) Natural and synthetic hormones.

(c) Vitamins, minerals, amino acids, glutathione, botanicals and their extracts, homeopathic medicines, electrolytes, sugars, and diluents that may be administered utilizing routes of
 administration, pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 3640, only when such substances are chemically identical to those for sale without a prescription.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 333, Sec. 2.   (SB 1446)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 3686.)
-------------------------------------------

3640.8.

(a) To qualify to administer intravenous (IV) therapy in their practice pursuant to Section 3640.7, a naturopathic doctor shall demonstrate that they have complied with both of the following requirements:

(1) Have a current naturopathic doctor’s license in this state.

(2) Have completed a qualifying course on IV therapy from a course provider approved by the board.

(b) The qualifying course shall consist of a minimum of 25 classroom hours on IV administration through injection of applicable naturopathic formulary substances, of which at least 14 classroom hours
 shall be identified as practicum. At a minimum, the qualifying course shall have covered all of the following topics:

(1) Evaluation of laboratory results, including, but not limited to, the fluid status, cardiovascular status, and kidney function of the patient.

(2) The use of IV fluids, including, but not limited to, osmolarity calculations, diluents, and admixtures pertinent to IV therapeutics.

(3) Sterile techniques and admixing.

(4) Vein and site selection, site preparation, and insertion techniques.

(5) Complications with therapies, nutrient and drug interactions, errors and adverse reactions,
 reporting errors to appropriate agencies, error prevention, and followup with patient complications.

(6) Emergency protocols, management, and referral.

(7) Pharmacology, indications, preparation, and IV administration of vitamins, minerals, amino acids, glutathione, botanicals and their extracts, homeopathic medicines, electrolytes, sugars, and diluents.

(8) Practicum, including, but not limited to, the following:

(A) Observation of at least 10 IV setups, including administration and management.

(B) Successful completion of at least 10 IV setups, including administration and management.

(9) Successful completion of an examination with 70 percent or greater correct answers to a minimum of 50 questions, where 10 percent or more of the questions have direct content to the California formulary.

(c) For the purposes of the qualifying course required by this section, one classroom hour is defined as 50 minutes out of each 60-minute segment and may include time devoted to examinations. No credit shall be granted for distance education, including, but not limited to, correspondence courses, internet courses, or video or remote television offerings.

(d) Pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 3640, the board may establish regulations regarding IV administration that are consistent with the education and training
 of a naturopathic doctor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 497, Sec. 39.   (SB 1526)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 3686.)
-------------------------------------------

3641.

(a) A naturopathic doctor shall document their observations, diagnosis, and summary of treatment in the patient record. Patient records shall be maintained for a period of not less than seven years following the discharge of the patient. The records of an unemancipated minor shall be maintained until at least one year after the minor has reached 18 years of age or seven years following the discharge of the minor, whichever is longer.

(b) A naturopathic doctor shall have the same authority and responsibility as a licensed physician and surgeon with regard to public health laws, including laws governing reportable diseases and conditions, communicable
 disease control and prevention, recording vital statistics, and performing health and physical examinations consistent with their education and training.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 497, Sec. 40.   (SB 1526)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 3686.)
-------------------------------------------

3642.

A naturopathic doctor may not perform any of the following functions:

(a) Prescribe, dispense, or administer a controlled substance or device identified in Sections 801 to 971, inclusive, of Title 21 of the United States Code, except as authorized by this chapter.

(b) Administer therapeutic ionizing radiation or radioactive substances.

(c) Practice or claim to practice any other system or method of treatment beyond that authorized by this chapter, for which licensure is required, unless otherwise licensed to do so.

(d) Administer general or spinal anesthesia.

(e) Perform an abortion.

(f) Perform any surgical procedure.

(g) Perform acupuncture or traditional Chinese and Asian medicine, including Chinese herbal medicine, unless licensed as an acupuncturist as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 4927.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 649, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2006.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 3686.)
-------------------------------------------

3643.

This chapter may not be construed to authorize a naturopathic doctor to practice medicine, as defined under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000), except as specifically authorized in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 485, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2004.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 3686.)
-------------------------------------------

3643.5.

(a) This chapter may not be construed to limit the practice of a person licensed, certified, or registered under any other provision of law relating to the healing arts when the person is engaged in his or her authorized and licensed practice.

(b) This chapter may not be construed to limit an activity that does not require licensure or is otherwise allowed by law, including the practice of naturopathy, when performed consistent with Sections 2053.5 and 2053.6.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 485, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2004.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 3686.)
-------------------------------------------

3644.

This chapter does not prevent or restrict the practice, services, or activities of any of the following:

(a) A person licensed, certified, or otherwise recognized in this state by any other law or regulation if that person is engaged in the profession or occupation for which they are licensed, certified, or otherwise recognized.

(b) A person employed by the federal government in the practice of naturopathic medicine while the person is engaged in the performance of duties prescribed by laws and regulations of the United States.

(c) A person rendering aid to a family member or in an emergency,
 if no fee or other consideration for the service is charged, received, expected, or contemplated.

(d) (1) A person who makes recommendations regarding or is engaged in the sale of food, extracts of food, nutraceuticals, vitamins, amino acids, minerals, enzymes, botanicals and their extracts, botanical medicines, homeopathic medicines, dietary supplements, and nonprescription drugs or other products of nature, the sale of which is not otherwise prohibited under state or federal law.

(2) An unlicensed person described in this subdivision may represent that they “practice naturopathy” if they comply with Section 2053.6. However, an unlicensed person may not use the title “naturopathic doctor” unless they have been issued a license by the board.

(e) A person engaged in good faith in the practice of the religious tenets of any church or religious belief without using prescription drugs.

(f) A person acting in good faith for religious reasons as a matter of conscience or based on a personal belief, while obtaining or providing information regarding health care and the use of any product described in subdivision (d).

(g) A person who provides the following recommendations regarding the human body and its function:

(1) Nonprescription products.

(2) Natural elements such as air, heat, water, and light.

(3) Class I or class II nonprescription, approved medical devices, as defined in Section 360c of Title 21 of the United States Code.

(4) Vitamins, minerals, herbs, homeopathics, natural food products and their extracts, and nutritional supplements.

(h) A person who is licensed in another state, territory, or the District of Columbia to practice naturopathic medicine if the person is incidentally called into this state for consultation with a naturopathic doctor.

(i) A student enrolled in an approved naturopathic medical program whose services are performed pursuant to a course of instruction under the supervision of a naturopathic doctor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 497, Sec. 41.   (SB 1526)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 3686.)
-------------------------------------------

3645.

(a) This chapter permits, and does not restrict, the use of the following titles by persons who are educated and trained as any of the following:

(1) “Naturopath.”

(2) “Naturopathic practitioner.”

(3) “Traditional naturopathic practitioner.”

(b) This chapter permits, and does not restrict, the education of persons as described in paragraphs (1) to (3),
 inclusive, of subdivision (a). Those persons are not required to be licensed under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 600, Sec. 10.   (SB 796)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 3686.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Naturopathic Childbirth Attendance [3650. - 3655.]

3650.

A naturopathic doctor may perform naturopathic childbirth attendance if they have completed additional training and have been granted a certificate of specialty practice by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 497, Sec. 42.   (SB 1526)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 3686.)
-------------------------------------------

3651.

In order to be certified for the specialty practice of naturopathic childbirth attendance, a naturopathic doctor shall obtain a passing grade on the American College of Nurse Midwives Written Examination, the American College of Naturopathic Obstetricians Examination, or a substantially equivalent examination approved by the board, and shall establish, to the board’s satisfaction, compliance with one of the following requirements:

(a) Successful completion of a certificate of midwifery or naturopathic obstetrics specialty from an approved naturopathic medical education program consisting of not less than 84 semester units or 126 quarter units that substantially complies with the following
 educational standards and requirements:

(1) The curriculum is presented in semester or quarter units under the following formula:

(A) One hour of instruction in theory each week throughout a semester or quarter equals one unit.

(B) Three hours of clinical practice each week throughout a semester or quarter equals one unit.

(2) The program provides both academic and clinical preparation that is substantially equivalent to that provided in a program accredited by the American College of Nurse Midwives. The program includes, but is not limited to, preparation in all of the following areas:

(A) The
 art and science of midwifery, one-half of which shall be in theory and one-half of which shall be in clinical practice. Theory and clinical practice shall be concurrent in the areas of maternal and child health, including, but not limited to, labor and delivery, neonatal well care, and postpartum care.

(B) Communications skills that include the principles of oral, written, and group communications.

(C) Anatomy and physiology, genetics, obstetrics and gynecology, embryology and fetal development, neonatology, applied microbiology, chemistry, child growth and development,
 pharmacology, nutrition, laboratory diagnostic tests and procedures, and physical assessment.

(D) Concepts in psychosocial, emotional, and cultural aspects of maternal and child care, human sexuality, counseling and teaching, maternal and infant and family bonding process, breast feeding, family planning, principles of preventive health, and community health.

(E) Aspects of the normal pregnancy, labor and delivery, postpartum period, newborn care, family planning, or routine gynecological care in alternative birth centers, homes, and hospitals.

(3) The program integrates the following subjects throughout its entire curriculum:

(A) Midwifery process.

(B) Basic intervention skills in preventive, remedial, and supportive midwifery.

(C) The knowledge and skills required to develop collegial relationships with health care providers from other disciplines.

(D) Related behavioral and social sciences with emphasis on societal and cultural patterns, human development, and behavior related to maternal and child health, illness, and wellness.

(4) Instruction in personal hygiene, client abuse, cultural diversity, and the legal, social, and ethical aspects of midwifery.

(5) Instruction in the midwifery management process which shall
 include all of the following:

(A) Obtaining or updating a defined and relevant database for assessment of the health status of the client.

(B) Identifying problems based upon correct interpretation of the database.

(C) Preparing a defined needs or problem list, or both, with corroboration from the client.

(D) Consulting, collaborating with, and referring to, appropriate members of the health care team.

(E) Providing information to enable clients to make appropriate decisions and to assume appropriate responsibility for their own health.

(F) Assuming direct responsibility for the development of comprehensive, supportive care for the client and with the client.

(G) Assuming direct responsibility for implementing the plan of care.

(H) Initiating appropriate measures for obstetrical and neonatal emergencies.

(I) Evaluating, with corroboration from the client, the achievement of health care goals and modifying the plan of care appropriately.

(b) Successful completion of an educational program that the board has determined satisfies the criteria of subdivision (a) and current licensure as a midwife by a state with licensing standards that have been found by the board to be substantially
 equivalent to those adopted by the board pursuant to this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 414, Sec. 8.   (AB 2685)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 3686.)
-------------------------------------------

3651.5.

A naturopathic doctor certified for the specialty practice of naturopathic childbirth attendance shall do both of the following:

(a) Maintain current certification in neonatal resuscitation and cardiopulmonary resuscitation.

(b) File with the board a written plan for the following:

(1) Consultation with other health care providers.

(2) Supervision by a licensed physician and surgeon who has current practice or training in obstetrics to assist a woman in childbirth so long as progress meets criteria accepted as normal. The plan
 shall provide that all complications shall be referred to a physician and surgeon immediately.

(3) Emergency transfer and transport of an infant or a maternity patient, or both, to an appropriate health care facility, and access to neonatal intensive care units and obstetrical units or other patient care areas.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 497, Sec. 43.   (SB 1526)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 3686.)
-------------------------------------------

3652.

(a) A certificate of specialty practice in naturopathic childbirth attendance shall expire concurrently with the licensee’s naturopathic doctor’s license.

(b) The certificate may be renewed upon submission of the renewal fee set by the board and evidence, to the board’s satisfaction, of the completion of 30 hours of continuing education credits in naturopathic childbirth, midwifery, or obstetrics. Fifteen hours may be applied to the 60 hours of continuing education required for naturopathic doctors.

(c) Licensing or disciplinary action by the board or a judicial authority shall be deemed to have an equal effect upon the
 specialty certificate to practice naturopathic childbirth issued to a licensee, unless otherwise specified in the licensing or disciplinary action. When the subject of a licensing or disciplinary action relates specifically to the practice of naturopathic childbirth by a licensee holding a specialty certificate, the action may, instead of affecting the entire scope of the licensee’s practice, suspend, revoke, condition, or restrict only the licensee’s authority under the specialty certificate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 497, Sec. 44.   (SB 1526)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 3686.)
-------------------------------------------

3653.

(a) Naturopathic childbirth attendance does not include the use or performance of any of the following:

(1) Forceps delivery.

(2) General or spinal anesthesia.

(3) Cesarean section delivery.

(4) Episiotomies, except to the extent that they meet the same supervision requirements set forth in Section 2746.52.

(b) Naturopathic childbirth attendance does not mean the management of complications in pregnancy, labor, delivery, or the neonatal period. All complications shall be referred to an obstetrician or other licensed physician and surgeon as appropriate.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 485, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2004.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 3686.)
-------------------------------------------

3654.

In addition to Section 3640, a naturopathic doctor who holds a specialty certificate in naturopathic childbirth attendance may administer, order, or perform any of the following:

(a) Postpartum antihemorrhagic drugs.

(b) Prophylactic opthalmic antibiotics.

(c) Vitamin K.

(d) RhoGAM.

(e) Local anesthetic medications.

(f) Intravenous fluids limited to lactated ringers, 5 percent dextrose with lactated ringers, and heparin and 0.9 percent sodium chloride for use in intravenous locks.

(g) Epinephrine for use in maternal anaphylaxis pending emergency transport.

(h) Measles, mumps, and rubella (MMR) vaccine to nonimmune, nonpregnant women.

(i) HBIG and GBV for neonates born to hepatitis B mothers, per current Centers for Disease Control guidelines.

(j) Antibiotics for intrapartum prophylaxis of Group B Betahemolytic Streptococcus (GBBS), per current Centers For Disease Control guidelines.

(k) Equipment incidental to the practice of naturopathic childbirth, specifically, dopplers, syringes, needles, phlebotomy equipment, suture, urinary catheters, intravenous equipment, amnihooks, airway suction devices, neonatal and adult resuscitation equipment, glucometer, and centrifuge.

(l) Equipment incidental to maternal care, specifically, compression stockings, maternity belts, breast pumps, diaphragms, and cervical caps.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 485, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2004.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 3686.)
-------------------------------------------

3655.

(a) A licensee holding a speciality certificate in naturopathic childbirth attendance shall disclose to each client, in writing, the following:

(1) The qualifications and credentials of the naturopathic doctor.

(2) A copy of the written plan for consultation, emergency transfer, and transport.

(3) A description of the procedures, benefits, and risks of birth in the home or outside of a hospital setting.

(4) The status of liability coverage of the licensee for the practice of naturopathic childbirth attendance.

(b) The form must be signed by the client, filed in the client’s chart, and a copy given to the client.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 485, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2004.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 3686.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Offenses and Enforcement [3660. - 3664.]

3660.

Except as provided in subdivision (h) of Section 3644, a person shall have a valid, unrevoked, or unsuspended license issued under this chapter to do any of the following:
